Utah statutes.
17-24-21.   Seal of county treasurers.

The county treasurer of each county shall have an official seal to be provided by the county legislative body with which to authenticate his official acts and records. It shall have inscribed thereon the words "County Treasurer -- Official Seal" and the name of the county in which the treasurer holds office.

